Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201844-9219
Rules and regulations.

The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Public Adjusters Licensing Act.

Laws 2018, LB743, § 19.
July 19, 2018